Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-227
Annual town meetings; notice; publication.

The citizens of the several towns of this state, qualified by the Constitution of Nebraska to vote at general elections, shall assemble and hold annual town meetings at their respective towns at the time of the budget hearing as provided by the Nebraska Budget Act. Notice of the time and the place of holding such meeting, after the first meeting, shall be given by the town clerk by publishing the notice in a newspaper in or of general circulation in the town at least ten days prior to the meeting.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 25, p. 139;

Laws 1909, c. 37, § 1, p. 222;

R.S.1913, § 1011;

C.S.1922, § 913;

Laws 1923, c. 139, § 1, p. 341;

Laws 1927, c. 54, § 1, p. 209;

C.S.1929, § 26-227;

R.S.1943, § 23-227;

Laws 1963, c. 112, § 1, p. 441;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 15;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 15.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.